Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-503 Closing of doors without notice.
If, upon the examination of any society, it is found to be insolvent, or if it
is deemed necessary by the commissioner for the protection of the interests of
its members or the public, the commissioner may at once close the doors of the
society without any notice and take charge of the books, assets and affairs of
the society until the appointment of a receiver as provided by law. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next